ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/nl_NL/1995/hyph_nl_NL.dic
UTF-8
% ADOBE CONFIDENTIAL
% ___________________
%
%  Copyright ©2011 Adobe Systems Incorporated
%  All Rights Reserved.
%
% NOTICE:  All information contained herein is, and remains
% the property of Adobe Systems Incorporated and its suppliers,
% if any.  The intellectual and technical concepts contained
% herein are proprietary to Adobe Systems Incorporated and its
% suppliers and are protected by trade secret or copyright law.
% Dissemination of this information or reproduction of this material
% is strictly forbidden unless prior written permission is obtained
% from Adobe Systems Incorporated.
%
% Version 1.0.1
%
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
NOHYPHEN -
1-1
NEXTLEVEL
i9ë/=e,2,1
e9ë/=e,2,1
o9ë/=e,2,1
uï1/=i,2,1
o9ï/=i,2,1
e9ï/=i,2,1
a9ï/=i,2,1
o9ö/=o,2,1
l9ë/=e,2,1
a9ë/=e,2,1
e9ü/=u,2,1
u9ü/=u,2,1
uu2
u9utje/=,2,1
oo2
o9otje/=,2,1
e9etje/é=,1,2
aa2
a9atje/=,2,1
uit9je/t=t,3,1
u2it
er1tj
ert9je/t=t,3,1
9'tje/=,1,1
9’tje/=,1,1
.depoo9tj2e./t=,5,1
.1de
.de1po
.depoo2
.depo9otje/=,5,1
.a2
.aan1
.aa2
.a1l1o
.as1t
.as1p
.an1gl
.ang3ste
.a4br
.a1b
.laat3ste
.laa2
.lo1v
.lu2i1t4
.maat2j
.1ma
.3maat
.maa2
.o2
.o1m1a
.om1s
.oes1
.oer1
.on1a
.on1ee2
.o1ne
.on2t
.on1t1a
.on1te4
.ont3ere2n
.onte1re
.ope3r
.op1r
.e2
.ee2
.ee1n1e
.eet1
.e1s1c
.es1p
.e2i1t
.er1on
.e1r1i
.e1r1u
.ek1
.eu1
.s2
.sis1
.1si
.sys3teem.
.n2
.1na1s
.1na3g2
.net1j
.1b2
.bli2
.bo2s1
.i2
.in1
.i1na2
.ij2
.ijs1
.do1v
.de2a
.di1a1b
.1di
.t2
.tent3j
.ter3a
.ts2
.vent3j
.ve2r
.vi3c
.1vi
.ro1v
.rij1t
.f2
.fo1li
.1fo
.j2
.k2
.ku3re
.1ku
.ku2r
.hors3
.u2
.ui2
.uit3j2e.
.uit9je/t=t,3,1
.u2it
.ui3tjes
.p2
.plaats3te
.plaa2
.pet1j
.piet3j
.pis3too2
.w2
.we2l
.y2
.x1
a1aap
aaa2
aal1a2
aal3ste
aa2ls
aa1m1a
aam1p
1aan1ta
aan1tj
aan1g
1aan1j
aan1k
aat1r
a2at1h
aa1r1a2
aar1o
aa1r1e
4aars
aa1r1i
a1la.
a1laa2
a1lag
a1lo
al1ou
al1op
a1le
a2l1el
a1li
al1do
al1fa
alk1s
al1un
al1ui
al1pa
a2lp
al1po
a1ly
a1oo2
a1oe
a1os
a1on
a1ot
a1ov
aor2
ao1p
ae1
as1ap
as1lo
as1li
as1on
a2s1op
a2s1e2t
a1se
as1ef
a2sec
asie2
a1si
as1ta
as1too2
as1tor
as1te
as1tri
a2st1h
as1tu
as1ja
as1jo
a2s1co
as1ha
as1ho
as1pa
as1pl
as1pi
as1pr
2a2n.
an2aa2
an1av
a1ne
a2n1ei
an2sa
an1sl
ans1oo2
an1sn
an1s2t
ans3t2e.
an1ste
an1spi
a1ni
2an1da
an1dri
antal4
an1ta
an2gan
an1ga
an1go
ang1sl
an2kaa2
an1ka
an2k1of2
an1ko
an1ui
a1ia
ai2l
ai3le
ail2de
ai1o
ai1e
ais2
ai1s1te
ain1s2t
aid2
a1ij2
ad1aa2
a1da
a2det
a1de
ad1se2
ad1w
a1tal
a1ta1s
a2t1ad
a1tat
a2t1ach
a1tap
a1to
a2t2o.
at1on
a1te
ats1l
at2sn
ats1tr
at1re
at1jes
2ath
3athec
a3tu
at1w
ag1a2d
a1ga
ag1av
ag1l
ag1or
ag1oc
age2lo
a1ge
a2gem
a2g1e2t
ags1n
ag1sta
ag1ste
a2gio
a1gi
a2g1ru
agr2
a2gu
ag1uu2
a1ve
a1vr
a1vu
a1ra
araat1
araa2
arm3ond
ar1mo
ar1ov
ar1op
a1re
a2rei
aret1j
ar2s1l
ar2no
a1ri
ar2d1ac
ar1da
ar2d1op
ar1do
ar2dr
ard1ri
ard1w
ar2top
ar1to
art3j
ar1kl
ar1u
a1ry
af1aa2
af1l
af1s2
af1dr
af1dw
1af1v
af1ran
afr2
af1ro
af1re
af1r2it
af1ru
a1ja
a1je
a3ka
ak1lo
ak1le
ak1on
a1ko
a2k1een
a1ke
akee2
ak1str
ak1sc
ak1sp
ak1n
aki1s
a1ki
akt1h
a2kt
ak1ra
ak1u2r
a1ku
ak1w
a1co
2a2ce
a3cen
ac3ti
a2ct
a1cha
a1cho
a1che
a1chi
a1chu
a1ha
a1ho
a1he
a1hi
ah1r
a1hu
au1sh
au1n
au1t
1au1to
1aug
au1r
ap1as
ap1le
ap1li
a1plu
a1pe
a2p2e.
ap1so
ap2sc
a1pi
ap1ro
ap2ri
ap1j
a1pu
1appr
ap1p
a1w
2l.
2lal
lamp1j
la1o
la1sa
4land2sex
land1se
lant1j
la1ta
la1tr
lat1j
l2at1h
la2ga
lag1r2
lar2m1i
2lau
l1l
l2l1p
2lm
l2m1op
l1mo
l2m1ed
l1me
lm1s2t
lm1p
lo1ac
1lol
l1omt
loot1
loo2
1lo1z
lont1j
lot1j
lo1ven
lo1ro
3lors
l1org
lou3s
lo1pe
l1op1h
lee2
2leeu
le2s1l
le1s1c
2le2su
les1p
le1na
len1sn
le1ni
len1tj
len1k
le2t1r
le1tj
le1go
1le1ra
le1ro
ler1kw
2ls
ls1aa2
l1sal
ls1an
l1sak
l1sau
l1sla
ls1le
ls2mu
ls1of
ls1n
l1stat
l1sto
l1ster
l2stek
l1str
l1sc
l1sp
l2s1pl
l1sy1
l1n
1lia
li1al
lie1n
lie2g1a
lie1ra
l1i2s1w
lint1j
lin3kl
1lid
li1to
l2it
li3te
li1t1h
1li1v
li2ve
lij2st
lij1sp
1lijn
li1kw
ld1om
ld1on
l1dor
lde1na
l1de
l2d1ei
ld1erf
l2d1ec
l2dex
ld1sl
ld1sp
ld1rei
ld1rij
ld1w
2lt
l1ta
l1to
l2t1o2v
l1te
lt1s2
lti1s
l1ti
l1tr
l1tj
l1tha
lt1ho
l1the
lt1hu
l1tu
lt1w
l1ty1
l1gl
l1go
lg1s
l3gr2
l1v
2l1r
lf1ana
lf1l
l2f1on
l1fo
l2f1end
l1fe
lfs1l
lf1sp
lf1ing
l1fi
lf1r2
l1j
l1kl
l2k1ee2
l1ke
lk1st
l1kn
lk1w
l1c
l1h
1lu1a
lu1o1
lu1str
lu1ne
lu4bl
lu2b
luit3j
lu2it
lu1ta
lu4gi
2lp
lp1ac
lp1ap
l1pl
lp1or
l1pe
l1pi
l1pr
lp1j
l1p2h
l1pu
l1w
1lyg
1ma
maas1
maa2
3maat
ma1la
ma1lu
ma1sp
ma1na
ma1no
ma1nu
3maild
mai2l
ma1tr
mat1j
m2a1th
ma1ro
ma1j
ma1kr
m2a3ce
mau1
m1l
m3la
m1m
1mo
mos1t
mo1na
mo1no
3mod
mot1j
mo1v
mo1ra
mo1ro
mo2r2e.
mo1re
mor2s
mor1s3te
mors2t
2mop
1me
me1o
meo1p
me1sto
me1sh
me1sp
me1na
me1ni
ment1j
2mengel
men1ge
3mei
m2et1s
me1tj
me1th
3me1v
me1ra
me1ro
2me1ru
me1c
m1sl
m1s2m
ms1o
m1sn
ms2t
ms3taa2
m1sto
m1ste
m1s1ti
m1str
m1sc
m1sp
m1sy1
mze2
m1z
m1no
m1ne
m1ni
m1nu
2m1b
1mi
mi2m
1mi3mi
mies1
mie1tj
mis1p
3mid1d2
mi1tr
m2it
mi1ra
mi1c
m1do
m1dr
m1ta
m1to
m1te
mte1st
m1tes
m1tr
m1g
m1v
mves1
m1r
m1f
mfo1l
m1fo
m1j
m1k
m1c
m1ce2
m1h
1mu
mu1sa
3mu1z
mu1ni
m1pa
mp1ach
m1pl
m1po
m3pe
m1pi
mp1to
m2pt
m1pr
m1pu
m1w
m1q
mys1
1mé
2o.
o1al
o1at
o1af
o1la
o3lan
ol1ac
o1lo
ol1op
o1le
o3l2e.
ole1st
o3len
ole3r
ole1u
ol1sl
o2ls
ol1sta
ol1ste
ols1h
o1lio
o1li1b
o1lu
o2l1ui
om1af
o1ma
o2m1op
o1mo
o2mes
o1me
om1sta
oms2t
o3mi
1om1dr
1om1r
om1pj
oo1l1a
oo3le
oo3li
oo3me
oon1a
oon1o
oon1tj
oo1d1i
ood1r
oo1t1a
oo3te
oot3ste
oo1g1r2
oor3a2
oor1o
oo1r1i
oor2d3aa2
oor1da
oor2ta
oor1tj
ook1s
oo3c
oop1a2
oo3pe
oe1ag
oe2l1ei
oe1le
oe1sp
oen1tj
oei1s
oe2d1ar
oe1da
oe2d1on
oe1do
oe2dr
oed1ri
oed1w
oe2ta
oe3te
oeg1l
oe1ra
oe1roe
oe3re
oer1k
oe2fa
oef1l
oe2fi
oek1ri
oe2ku
oe2pl
oeps1
oe1pi
os1aa2
o1s1at
os1lo
os1li
o1so
os1na
os1no
os1tal
os1te
o1str
os1tu
os3j
os1c
os2cr2
o1spo
os1pe
os1pi
os1pr
o1sy1
o1nal
2ona2l.
2ona2ls
on1ac
o1nau
on1on
on1ov
on1of
on1ou
o1ne
on1eet1
onee2
on1eni
o1ne2n
o2n1ei
on1e2v
on1er1v
o1ner
on1ef
on1ec
on1sm
on1s2t
onne1s
on1n
o1ni
on2dac
on1da
ond1om
on2dij
on1di
ond1r
on3to
on2t1re
on1tr
ont1h
ont1w
on1gl
ong3ste
on1gr2
2on1f
on1kr
on1ui
obi1s
o1b
1o2b1j
oi1e
ois2
oi1s1te
oi1tj
o2it
o1do
od2sa
od1re
od1ri
od1ui
o1du
od1w
o1ta
o1t1as
o2t1ac
o1to
ot1ou
o1te
ote1a
ot1so
ot1sp
ot1r
o1th
ot1ha
ot1hu
o1tu
o1ty1
2o1ga
og1a2l.
og1ar
og1l
og1ov
og1sta
og1ste
og1s2p
oggeplaat3
og1g
og1ge
ogge1p
ogge1pl
oggeplaa2
o1gr2
o3gra
og1ui
o1gu
2o1va
o1vo
2o1vi
or1av
or1af
orlaat3
or1l
orlaa2
or2m1ac
or1ma
or1oo2
or1ov
or1op
o1re
or3se
or1sn
o1ri
or2daa2
or1da
or2d1oo2
or1do
or2d1or
ord1w
or2top
or1to
or1th
or1kn
or1kw
oru2
or1ui
or1u2r
orp2
o1fa
of1l
of1sm
of2d1a
ofd1r
2oft
of1ro
ofr2
o1j
o2k1aas
o1ka
okaa2
ok1lu
ok1ol
o1ko
ok1on
ok1ei
o1ke
o3ker
ok1sa
ok1sta
oks1p
ok1to
o2kt
ok1ro
o1k1ru
ok1w
o1co
o1che
o1chi
o1chu
o1h
ou1so
ou2s2e.
ou1se
oun2g
out1r
out1j
our1o
ou1c
op1aan
opaa2
op1am
op1a2t.
o1par
op1au
o1pap
op1l
o1p2lan
op1on
o1pog
op1of
o1pea
o1pel
op1een
op1ei
op1e2t
o1pec
op1sl
op1so
op1sn
op3sc
1opna
op1n
o1pi
opi1er
op1i2n.
op1ra
op1re
op1ru
op1j
o1pu
op1ui
o1wa
o1we
o1wi
o1q
2e.
e1aa2
e1al
e2a2l.
e2a2l1s
ea2s
e1an
ea2ni
eang1
e1a1b
e1ai
ead1s
e1at
e1av
e1ar
e1af
e1ac
e1la
e2l1al
el1a2ct
e2l1au
e1lo
el1om
el1ond
el1ont
e2lor
e1le
eles3
el1eis
ele3re
el1so
e2ls
el1ste
el1sh
e1li
e3lig
el3den
el1de
e1lu
el1pa
e2lp
el1po
e1ly1
em1s2t
em1pj
e1ol
eolo4ge
eo1lo
e1om1
e1oo2
e1oe
e1on
eo1i
e1o1do
e1og
e1ov
e1or
eo1ro
e1of
e1o2h
eo1p1l
e1opr
ee1l1a
ee2l1o
eel1st
ee2ls
ee3mo
eee2
e1eet
ee1eg
ee1sn
eest1a
ees1te
ee3sc
ee1sho
ees1pl
ee1spe
ee1spr
een1s2t
een1tj
1een1v
1een1j
een1k
ee2t1ap
ee1ta
ee2t1i
ee3ga
eeg1l
ee2g1r2
eer1a
ee1roo2
eer1on
ee1rot
ee1r2o1v
ee1rou
eersys3
eer1sy
eer1k
ee2f
ee2ke
eek1en
ee2ki
eek1re
eek1w
es1aa2
es1al
es1af
es1ac
es1ap
e1sl
e2s1lij
es2m
es3mi
es1om
es1oo2
esent3j
e1se
e2s1ex
es2sn
e2s1s2
e2s1il
e1si
esis2
esi1st
es1in
es1tam
es3tant
e2st1ac
e2s3t2e.
es3te1le
es1ten
e2s3te2n.
es1ter
e2stie
es1ti
es3je
e1sc
es1ha
es1hi
e1su
es1ur
es1pen
e1spi
es1pri
es2wa
e2s1w
e1sy1
eze3s
e1z
en1a2l.
en1a2ls
en1av
en1ars
e1nar1c
en1a2kt
en1ac
e3nom
e1noo2
e1noe
en1on
e1nod
en1ov
en1ord
en1of
en1oc
en1ou
en1op
e1ne
e2nent
e1ne2n
en3entw
en1enc
e3neig
e2nei
1e2nerg
e1ner
e2n1ec
en1soo2
en1sp
en1i2n.
e1nin
e1ni1v
en1do
en2ded
en1de
en1dri
ent1ac
en1ta
en1th
engs3ten
en1gr2
en1kr
en1ui
e1nut
en1uu2
ei1a
ei1e
ei1spr
ein1tj
ei1do
ei1r
e1ij2
e3dap
e1da
e1do
e2d1ov
ede1st
e1de
ed1sp
e2d1ins
e1di
e1dr
e3dra
e1ta
e2tap
e1to
et1ond
e1te
e2t1een1
eten3tj
ete1ra
2ets
et1sl
et1su2
ets1pa
et1spo
e1tr
e1tu
et1wa
et1we
e1ty1
eg1lo
eg1ou
eg1sl
eg1st
eg1sc
e1gr2
e2g1ru
eg1u2r
e1gu
e1v
even1t
e1ra.
e1raad
eraa2
e1ram
e3r2an1da
e1rang
e1r2anc
e1rai
e1rat
era2g
er1avo
e2r1ac
e2r1au
erlaats3
er1l
erlaa2
er1oli
er1om.
er1oe1v
e1ro2n.
er1o1ne
er1ont
e1rod
er1ov
er1or
e1rok
er1oc
e2r1o2p
e1re
ere2n
ere1n1e
e2r1eig
e2rer
er1ef1f
er1s1mi
ers2m
ers1e2t
er1se
e1ri
e3rig
e3rif
e2r1ijs
er1ij2z
e3rik
er1dw
er1th
er1gl
er4vet
er1v
e1ru
erug1
er1u2r
1er2wt
er1w
e1fa
ef1om
e1fo
ef1sl
ef1sp
ef1ij
e1fi
e1fr2
e1fu
e1j
ek1aan
e1ka
ekaa2
e1kl
e2k1een
e1ke
ekee2
ek1ei
e3ker
ek1sm
ek1so
e1kra
ek1u2r
e1ku
e2k1uu2
e1cor
e1cha
e1che
e1chi
e1h
eun1s
eu1ni
eun1tj
eu1tr
eut1j
eug2dr
eu2r1at
eu1ra
e1pa
e1pl
e1po
e2p1op
e1pe
eper1s3te
e1pers
epers2t
ep2str
ep1s2t
ep1s1c
ep2s1p
e1pr
ep1j
e1pu
e1w
ey1
1exa
2s.
1sa.
s1aan
saa2
1saag
1sa1la
1sas
sas1t
sant1j
1sai
1sat
sa1ta
s1a2t1l
s3at1t
s1av
1saj
sa2ca
1slaa2
s1lam
s1las
2s1lat
1slag
s1loos
sloo2
2s1lo1z
s1log
s1les
2s1lei
s1leg
s1le1v
1slin
2s1lid
s1lig
2slij
s1lijs
3slijt
s2lik
2s1lic
1slui
s1luc
s3man
s1ma
1smad
s3mat
s3men
s1me
1s2o.
so1li
s1om1k
s1ook
soo2
so1na
s1on2t1
son1te2
2song
so2bl
so1b
1sod
s1o2g
s1ov
s1ork
1sok
2sop
s1op1l
s1op1g
3sop1j
1se
sel1ac
se1la
2se1mu
3se2s.
se1sa
se1st
2se1sc
se2z
se1na
sen1sl
se1ni
sen1tw
2seis
s1eig
se2t
s1e1te
set1j
se1ra
se3ri
s1ech
se1um
se1q
2sex
2s1s2
s3sa
ss3agen
ssa1ge
s2sm
s3se
ssen1t
ss3ni
ssis2
s1si
ssis3ten2t.
ssis1te
ssy1
s3zi
s1z
1snap
sno1v
1snel
s1net
s1ni1s
sbui1
s1b
1si
si1am
si2ot
sie1sp
sie1ra
si3stee
sis1te
sis3ter
sis1p
si1no
2sind
2s1in1v
2s1in1f
3s2it
3sig
si1r
s1d
2s2t.
2s3ta1li
1stav
st1avo
2stac
s2t1ach
1stol
stoot3j
stoo2
st1oef
1stot
1stof
1stok
sto2p
2stea
1ste1me
3stee2m1b
ste1na
3sten1te
1sted
st1e2ve
ste1v
s2te2r1ac
2st1s2
2st1ijs
s1ti
2stij1v
2st1v
straat3j
straa2
3strali1sche
stra1li
st3rol1l
1strom
2st1rei
2st1reg
st1rec
st1r2it
1stru
st1j
2sth
st1ha
st1ho
st1hek
st1hi
st1hu
1stud
1stuk
2st1w
2s1g
s3ge
sge1n
2s1v
s3vo
sve2
2s1r
s3ru
s1f
s1jou
s1je
s2jer
s1ju
s1k
1s2ki.
s1ki
s3cl
2sco
2s1ce2
2s1ci
sci1e
1sche
s1hol
s1hoo2
s1hoe
s1hon
s1hot
s1hof
s1hok
s1hou
1show
s1he
1s2hen
she2r
1shir
s1hu
sus1
2s1un
2sp.
s1pas
2spak
2spla
s2pli
s1pos
s2por
2s1pers
s1ps
1spra
2s1w
s3wo
1z
2z.
za2k1l
zak1s
zoot1
zoo2
zoog1
zo2et1s
zoet1j
zo1i1e
zo1d
zo1v
zor2g1a
zo1f
zo1p
ze2lac
ze1la
zel2v
zel2f
zee3l
ze2s
zes3m
ze1s1e
zen1o
ze1ni
zend1r
zen1t
zen1k
ze2t1a
ze1t1r
zet1j
ze1ro
zer1sn
ze1c
2z1z
zie2k1l
zi1ne1
z2it1
2z1t
2z1r
2zj
zus1
zui2gi
2z1p
z2w
2n.
1na.
1naam
naa2
n1aan
1naai
naat1
1naar.
1n4aars
n1aard
1naart
1naak
na1la
1nam
na2me1b
na1me
n1a2m1b
1nas
na1sl
na1sp
1na1z
1nai
1na1d
n1a2d1v
1nat
na1ta
na1tr
n2a1th
1na1g2
n1arm
1na1re
nar2s3t
n1ar1b
1na1ri
n1art
2n1af
na1kl
na1kr
na1pr
1naä
n1l
nlaa3
1nle1z
n1m
n1mu1
1n2o.
no1a
1nol
1nom
n1om1g
n1om1w
1nood
noo2
noot1
2noor
noes1
1nos
no1sa
1no1z
n1ont
1noi
1not
1nog
no2gal
n2o1ga
1n2o1va
no1ra
no1ro
n1ort
n1org
n1oud
n1op1l
no1po
no1pe
n1op1z
n1op1g
n1op1v
n1op1h
1nox
1n2e.
1nem
ne1o
neo1p
nee2
2n1een
2need
neet1
1ne1si
ne1sta
1ne2n
nen1a
nen1o
nen1e1g
ne1ne
nen1sl
nen1k
2nei
n1ei.
n1eil
n1ein
ne2di
n1e2du
ne2ton
ne1to
ne2t1re
ne1tr
net1w
ne1g
1ner
ne1ra
ne3re
ne1kw
ne2pl
ne1q
ns1aa2
ns1a2d
n1sag
ns1ar
ns1ac
n1sau
n1sap
ns1lan
ns1le
ns1li
ns2ma
n1s2me
n1sol
ns1om1
n1soe
ns1on
n1sor
n1soc
ns1een
n1se
ns1na
ns1nor
n1sne
ns2t
n1sta
ns3ta1le
n1ste
n1s1ti
n2st3ij1v
n1str
ns1ja
n1sjo
n1sc
ns2cr2
ns1ha
n1su
n2s1ui
ns1pl
ns3port
ns2por
n1spe
n1sy1
n1n
nno1v
nne1tj
nbi2
n1b
1ni.
1nia
1ni1o
n1ied
niet1j
ni1eur
1nis
ni1sta
ni1str
1ni1z
1nin
ni1no
2n1in1s
2n1int
2n1in1f
nink1
ni1to
n2it
1nir
2n1ij2z
ni2ko
1nic
ni3ce
ni2ch
1ni1u
1ni9ë/=e,3,1
n2d1art
n1da
nd1a2ct
n1doo2
nd1ov
n1dor
nd1of
